Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.105

Actions not subject to review by board.

The following actions shall not be subject to potential review by a boundary review board:

(1) Annexations of territory to a water-sewer district pursuant to RCW 36.94.410 through 36.94.440;

(2) Revisions of city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.21.790 or 35A.21.210;

(3) Adjustments to city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.13.340; and

(4) Adjustments to city and town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.13.300 through 35.13.330.

[ 1999 c 153 s 46; 1989 c 84 s 4; 1984 c 147 s 5.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.